Hawaii statutes.
[§667-93]
Recordation of notice of default and intention to foreclose. Before the
deadline date in the notice of default and intention to foreclose, the notice
may be recorded in a recordable form in a manner similar to recordation of
notices of pendency of action under section 501-151 or section 634-51, or both,
as applicable. The recorded notice of default and intention to foreclose shall
have the same effect as a notice of pendency of action. From and after the
recordation of the notice of default and intention to foreclose, any person who
becomes a purchaser or encumbrancer of the unit shall be deemed to have
constructive notice of the power of sale foreclosure and shall be bound by the
foreclosure. [L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next